Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 6 Mineral Leases

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d Gas and Oil §§ 55 to 141; 53A Am. Jur. 2d Mines and Minerals §§ 23 to 170; 72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies §§ 64 to 68.

Validity of prohibition or regulation of removal or exploitation of oil, minerals, soil, sand, gravel, stone or other natural products within municipal limits, 10 ALR3d 1226.

Duty of oil or gas lessee to restore surface of leased premises upon termination of operations, 62 ALR4th 1153.

73B C.J.S. Public Lands § 197.